Utah statutes.
7-9-26.   Loans to members -- Investment officers -- Investments.

(1) Subject to Subsections 7-9-20(7) and (8) and Section 7-9-58, capital and surplus of the credit union shall be loaned to the members for the purposes and upon the endorsements or security and the terms as the bylaws provide.

(2)  Within 30 days after the annual meeting of the members the board of directors may appoint one or more investment officers who shall have responsibilities for the credit union investment portfolio based upon policy established by the board of directors and as provided in this chapter or in the bylaws.

(3)  The credit union by action of its board of directors may invest its funds as follows:

(a)  in securities, obligations, or other instruments of, or issued by, or fully guaranteed as to principal and interest by, the United States of America or any of its agencies, or in any trusts established by investing directly or collectively in these instruments;

(b)  in obligations of any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and the territories organized by Congress, or any of their political subdivisions;

(c)  in certificates of deposit or accounts issued by a federally insured state or national depository institution;

(d)  in loans to, or in shares or deposits of, other federally insured credit unions, central credit unions, corporate credit unions, or a central liquidity facility established under state or federal law;

(e)  in shares, stocks, loans, or other obligations of any organization, corporation, or association, if the membership or ownership of the organization, corporation, or association is primarily confined or restricted to credit unions, and if the purpose for which it is organized is to strengthen or advance the development of credit unions or credit union organizations; and

(f)  in other investments that are reasonable and prudent.



Amended by Chapter 327, 2003 General Session

